FST/Tur/morph_tur.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %+N %+SG %+PL %+PSS2P %+PSS1P %+PSS2S %+PSS3S %+NOM %+DAT %+LOC %+GEN %+ACC %+ABL

LEXICON Root

Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
masör     Ninf;
giysi     Ninf;
ahtapot   Ninf;
şemsiye   Ninf;
kale      Ninf;
öküz      Ninf;
dilsizlik  Ninf;
göt       Ninf;
kloroplast  Ninf;
cemaat	  Ninf;
bölge	  Ninf;
sözlükçü  Ninf;
çiçek% tozu  Ninf;
gerzek    Ninf;
gözlem    Ninf;
oda       Ninf;
ev        Ninf;
olmazsa% olmaz Ninf;
ilâç      Ninf;
hudut     Ninf;

LEXICON Ninf

%+N%+SG%+NOM:0       #;
%+N%+PL%+NOM:^lar    #;
%+N%+SG%+DAT:^ye     #;
%+N%+PL%+DAT:^lere   #;
%+N%+SG%+LOC:^de     #;
%+N%+PL%+LOC:^lerde  #;
%+N%+SG%+GEN:^un     #;
%+N%+PL%+GEN:^lerin  #;
%+N%+SG%+ACC:^i      #;
%+N%+PL%+ACC:^leri   #;
%+N%+SG%+ABL:^den    #;
%+N%+PL%+ABL:^lerden #;
%+N%+SG%+NOM%+PSS1P:^miz #;
%+N%+PL%+NOM%+PSS1P:^lerimiz  #;
%+N%+SG%+DAT%+PSS1P:^mize  #;
%+N%+PL%+DAT%+PSS1P:^lerimize  #;
%+N%+SG%+GEN%+PSS1P:^ümüzün  #;
%+N%+PL%+GEN%+PSS1P:^lerimizin  #;
%+N%+SG%+ACC%+PSS1P:^ümüzü  #;
%+N%+PL%+ACC%+PSS1P:^lerimizi  #;
%+N%+SG%+ABL%+PSS1P:^ümüzden   #;
%+N%+PL%+ABL%+PSS1P:^mızdan  #;
%+N%+SG%+LOC%+PSS1P:^ümüzde   #;
%+N%+PL%+LOC%+PSS1P:^lerimizde #;
%+N%+SG%+NOM%+PSS2P:^niz  #;
%+N%+PL%+NOM%+PSS2P:^leriniz  #;
%+N%+SG%+DAT%+PSS2P:^ünüze  #;
%+N%+PL%+DAT%+PSS2P:^o  #;
%+N%+SG%+ACC%+PSS2P:^ünüzü  #;
%+N%+PL%+ACC%+PSS2P:^z  #;
%+N%+SG%+GEN%+PSS2P:^ünüzün  #;
%+N%+PL%+GEN%+PSS2P:^q  #;
%+N%+SG%+ABL%+PSS2P:^ünüzden  #;
%+N%+PL%+ABL%+PSS2P:^w  #;
%+N%+SG%+LOC%+PSS2P:^ünüzde  #;
%+N%+PL%+LOC%+PSS2P:^x   #;
